Mississippi, session 2026, HB233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 41-9-20, Mississippi Code of 1972: 41-9-20.  (1)  For purposes of this section, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this subsection: (a)  "Rural hospital" means a licensed Mississippi hospital that has fifty (50) or fewer licensed general acute, nonspecialty beds. (b)  "Major hospital" means a licensed Mississippi hospital that has more than fifty (50) licensed general acute, nonspecialty beds. (2)  A patient of a rural hospital shall be admitted to an emergency room of a major hospital when a doctor of such rural hospital deems it is medically necessary to transfer such patient to the major hospital. (3)  The State Department of Health shall prescribe rules and regulations that provide what situations shall be considered medically necessary in compliance with this section.  In adopting such rules, the department shall consider the following: (a)  Disparities between a rural hospital and a major hospital that could increase the patient's likelihood of having an adverse health reaction if the patient stayed at the rural hospital; (b)  Chronic conditions that may be better treated in major hospitals; (c)  Emergency conditions that may be better treated in major hospitals; (d)  Procedures for transfer that ensure efficiency and the best possible health outcome for the patient. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.